Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-116
Examination; expenses collected; Department of Insurance Cash Fund; created; use; investment; transfers.

(1) All money collected by the Department of Insurance for examination of the affairs of domestic, foreign, or alien insurance companies and insurers as defined in and pursuant to the Insurers Examination Act or any other provision of Chapter 44 or for valuing the reserve liabilities of life insurance companies shall be remitted by the department to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Insurance Cash Fund, which fund is hereby created. Money in the Department of Insurance Cash Fund may be used for transfers to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Department of Insurance Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer seventeen million two hundred thousand dollars from the Department of Insurance Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer nineteen million dollars from the Department of Insurance Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer sixteen million eight hundred thousand dollars from the Department of Insurance Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2028, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer sixteen million eight hundred thousand dollars from the Department of Insurance Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2029, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 21, p. 406;

R.S.1913, § 3157;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. III, § 14, p. 584;

Laws 1921, c. 24, § 2, p. 150;

C.S.1922, § 7758;

Laws 1923, c. 189, § 1, p. 433;

C.S.1929, § 44-214;

R.S.1943, § 44-116;

Laws 1955, c. 169, § 1, p. 484;

Laws 1965, c. 251, § 1, p. 709;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 43, p. 2370;

Laws 1983, LB 469, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 11;

Laws 1991, LB 233, § 43;

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 11;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 30;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 13;

Laws 2026, LB967, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 137.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB967, section 1, with LB1072, section 137, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB967 became effective July 18, 2026. Changes made by LB1072 became operative April 8, 2026.
Insurers Examination Act, see section 44-5901.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.